Washington statutes.
RCW 2.48.230

Code of ethics.

The code of ethics of the American Bar Association shall be the standard of ethics for the members of the bar of this state.

[ 1921 c 126 s 15; RRS s 139-15. Prior: 1917 c 115 s 20.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: See Code of Professional Responsibility, also Code of Judicial Conduct.

Reviser's note: RCW 2.48.190, 2.48.200, 2.48.220, and 2.48.230 are the only sections of the earlier act relating to the admission, regulation, disbarment, etc., of attorneys which are thought not to be embraced within the general repeal contained in the state bar act of 1933.